Washington statutes.
RCW 18.225.130

Prior certification under chapter 18.19 RCW.

Any person certified under chapter 18.19 RCW who has met the applicable experience and education requirements under chapter 18.19 RCW prior to July 22, 2001, is eligible for a license as an advanced social worker, an independent clinical social worker, a marriage and family therapist, or a mental health counselor under this chapter without taking the examination.

[ 2001 c 251 s 13.]